Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.486

Low-income home rehabilitation revolving loan program—Contracts with rehabilitation agencies—Reports. (Contingent repeal.)

(1) The department must contract with rehabilitation agencies to provide home rehabilitation to participating homeowners. Preference must be given to local agencies delivering programs and services with similar eligibility criteria.

(2) Any rehabilitation agency may charge participating homeowners an administrative fee of no more than seven percent of the home rehabilitation loan amount. The administrative fee must become a component of the total loan amount to be repaid by the participating homeowner.

(3) Any rehabilitation agency receiving funding under this section must report to the department at least quarterly, or in alignment with federal reporting, whichever is the greater frequency, the project costs and the number of homes repaired or rehabilitated. The director must review the accuracy of these reports.

[ 2017 c 285 s 3.]

NOTES:

Contingent repeal—2023 c 380: See note following RCW 43.330.482.